North Dakota statutes. TITLE 32 Judicial Remedies
CHAPTER 32-05 Preventive Relief

32-05-01.
When preventive relief given.

Preventive relief may be given in the cases specified in this chapter and in no other cases.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1987; R.C. 1895, § 5017; R.C. 1899, § 5017; R.C. 1905, § 6602; C.L. 1913, § 7185; R.C. 1943, § 32-0501.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 3366.

Cross-References.

Labor disputes and court proceedings therein, see N.D.C.C. ch. 34-08.

32-05-02.
Preventive relief not given to enforce penal law.

Preventive relief cannot be granted to enforce a penal law, except in a case of nuisance, nor to enforce a penalty or forfeiture in any case.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1990; R.C. 1895, § 5020; R.C. 1899, § 5020; R.C. 1905, § 6605; C.L. 1913, § 7188; R.C. 1943, § 32-0502.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 3369.

32-05-03.
How preventive relief given.

Preventive relief consists in prohibiting a party from doing that which ought not to be done. It is granted by injunction, temporary or final.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, §§ 1989, 2014; R.C. 1895, §§ 5019, 5043; R.C. 1899, §§ 5019, 5043; R.C. 1905, §§ 6604, 6628; C.L. 1913, §§ 7187, 7211; R.C. 1943, § 32-0503.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 3368, 3420.

32-05-04.
When final injunction granted.

Except when otherwise provided by this chapter, a final injunction may be granted to prevent the breach of an obligation existing in favor of the applicant:

When pecuniary compensation would not afford adequate relief;

When it would be extremely difficult to ascertain the amount of compensation which would afford adequate relief;

When the restraint is necessary to prevent a multiplicity of judicial proceedings; or

When the obligation arises from a trust.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 2016; R.C. 1895, § 5045; R.C. 1899, § 5045; R.C. 1905, § 6630; C.L. 1913, § 7213; R.C. 1943, § 32-0504.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 3422.

Cross-References.

Use of injunction in labor disputes, see N.D.C.C. ch. 34-08.

32-05-05.
When injunction not granted.

An injunction cannot be granted:

To stay a judicial proceeding pending at the commencement of the action in which the injunction is demanded, unless such restraint is necessary to prevent a multiplicity of such proceedings.

To stay proceedings in a court of the United States.

To stay proceedings in any other state upon a judgment of a court of that state.

To prevent the execution of a public statute by officers of the law for the public benefit.

To prevent the breach of a contract, the performance of which could not be specifically enforced.

To prevent the exercise of a public or private office in a lawful manner by the person in possession.

To prevent a legislative act by a municipal corporation.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 2017; R.C. 1895, § 5046; R.C. 1899, § 5046; S.L. 1901, ch. 108, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 6631; C.L. 1913, § 7214; R.C. 1943, § 32-0505.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 3423.

Cross-References.

Restrictions on granting preventive relief by courts in labor disputes, see N.D.C.C. § 34-08-03.